Utah statutes.
63G-6a-407.   Purpose of specifications.

(1)  All specifications shall seek to promote the overall economy and best use for the purposes intended and encourage competition in satisfying the needs of the procurement unit, and may not be unduly restrictive.

(2)  The requirements of this part regarding the purposes and nonrestrictiveness of specifications shall apply to all specifications, including those prepared by architects, engineers, designers, and draftsmen for public contracts.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

